Utah statutes.
53A-2-404.   Resale of surplus property.

(1)  If an eligible entity that has acquired surplus property under Section 53A-2-403 afterwards declares that property to be surplus, the school district from which the eligible entity acquired the property may purchase, and the eligible entity shall sell, the property as provided in Section 53A-2-403, except that the price at which the school district shall be entitled to reacquire the property shall be the price that the eligible entity paid for the property, plus the cost of any existing improvements that the eligible entity made to the property after it purchased the property.

(2)  If the school district does not reacquire the surplus property under Subsection (1) and the eligible entity sells the surplus property to another buyer, the eligible entity and the school district shall equally share any proceeds of that sale that exceed the amount the eligible entity paid for the property plus the cost of any existing improvements the eligible entity made to the property after it purchased the property.

